Utah statutes.
78B-1-105.   Jurors -- Competency to serve -- Persons not competent to serve as jurors -- Court to determine disqualification.

(1)  A person is competent to serve as a juror if the person is:

(a)  a citizen of the United States;

(b)  18 years of age or older;

(c)  a resident of the county; and

(d)  able to read, speak, and understand the English language.

(2)  A person who has been convicted of a felony which has not been expunged is not competent to serve as a juror.

(3)  The court, on its own initiative or when requested by a prospective juror, shall determine whether the prospective juror is disqualified from jury service.  The court shall base its decision on:

(a)  information provided on the juror qualification form;

(b)  an interview with the prospective juror; or

(c)  other competent evidence.

(4)  The clerk shall enter the court's determination in the records of the court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

